src/morphology/stems/interjections.lexc
!! Interjections
!! -------------
!! Interjections in Klingon are exclamations.

LEXICON Interjections
ghobe’+Intj:ghobe’    #  ;
Ha’+Intj:Ha’    #  ;
HIja’+Intj:HIja’    #  ;
HISlaH+Intj:HISlaH    #  ;
lu’+Intj:lu’    #  ;
luq+Intj:luq    #  ;
maj+Intj:maj    #  ;
majQa’+Intj:majQa’    #  ;
nuqneH+Intj:nuqneH    #  ;
pItlh+Intj:pItlh    #  ;
Qo’+Intj:Qo’    #  ;
SuH+Intj:SuH    #  ;
Su’+Intj:Su’    #  ;
toH+Intj:toH    #  ;
wejpuH+Intj:wejpuH    #  ;
’eH+Intj:’eH    #  ;
Qi’yaH+Intj:Qi’yaH    #  ;
ghuy’cha’+Intj:ghuy’cha’    #  ;
Qu’vatlh+Intj:Qu’vatlh    #  ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
